Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.030

Powers and duties of director. (Contingent expiration date.)

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter and chapter 18.235 RCW, with the advice and approval of the commission;

(2) To receive and approve or deny applications for certification or licensure as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser and for registration as a state-registered appraiser trainee under this chapter; to establish appropriate administrative procedures for the processing of such applications; to issue certificates, licenses, or registrations to qualified applicants pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; and to maintain a roster of the names and addresses of individuals who are currently certified, licensed, or registered under this chapter;

(3) To provide administrative assistance to the members of and to keep records for the real estate appraiser commission;

(4) To solicit bids and enter into contracts with educational testing services or organizations for the preparation of questions and answers for certification or licensure examinations;

(5) To administer or contract for administration of certification or licensure examinations at locations and times as may be required to carry out the responsibilities under this chapter;

(6) To enter into contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(7) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the experience, education, and examination requirements for each classification of state-certified appraiser and for licensure;

(8) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the educational requirements for the state-registered appraiser trainee classification;

(9) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the maximum number of state-registered appraiser trainees that each supervisory appraiser will be permitted to supervise;

(10) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to continuing education requirements as a prerequisite to renewal of certification or licensure;

(11) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to standards of professional appraisal conduct or practice in the enforcement of this chapter;

(12) To employ such professional, clerical, and technical assistance as may be necessary to properly administer the work of the director;

(13) To establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(14) To establish an expert review appraiser roster comprised of state-certified or licensed real estate appraisers whose purpose is to assist the director by applying their individual expertise by reviewing real estate appraisals for compliance with this chapter. Qualifications to act as an expert review appraiser shall be established by the director with the advice of the commission. An application to serve as an expert review appraiser shall be submitted to the real estate appraiser program, and the roster of accepted expert review appraisers shall be maintained by the department. An expert review appraiser may be added to or deleted from that roster by the director. The expert review appraiser shall be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner as the department reimburses the commission; and

(15) To do all other things necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and minimally meet the requirements of federal guidelines regarding state certification or licensure of appraisers and registration of state-registered appraiser trainees that the director determines are appropriate for state-certified and state-licensed appraisers and state-registered appraiser trainees in this state.

[ 2005 c 339 s 4; 2002 c 86 s 238; 2000 c 249 s 2; 1996 c 182 s 4; 1993 c 30 s 4; 1989 c 414 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

PDFRCW 18.140.030

Powers and duties of director. (Contingent effective date.)

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter and chapter 18.235 RCW, with the advice and approval of the commission;

(2) To receive and approve or deny applications for certification or licensure as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser and for registration as a state-registered appraiser trainee under this chapter; to establish appropriate administrative procedures for the processing of such applications; to issue certificates, licenses, or registrations to qualified applicants pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; and to maintain a roster of the names and addresses of individuals who are currently certified, licensed, or registered under this chapter;

(3) To provide administrative assistance to the members of and to keep records for the real estate appraiser commission;

(4) To solicit bids and enter into contracts with educational testing services or organizations for the preparation of questions and answers for certification or licensure examinations;

(5) To administer or contract for administration of certification or licensure examinations at locations and times as may be required to carry out the responsibilities under this chapter;

(6) To enter into contracts for professional services determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;

(7) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the experience, education, and examination requirements for each classification of state-certified appraiser and for licensure;

(8) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the educational requirements for the state-registered appraiser trainee classification;

(9) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to the maximum number of state-registered appraiser trainees that each supervisory appraiser will be permitted to supervise;

(10) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to continuing education requirements as a prerequisite to renewal of certification or licensure;

(11) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser commission relating to standards of professional appraisal conduct or practice in the enforcement of this chapter;

(12) To employ such professional, clerical, and technical assistance as may be necessary to properly administer the work of the director;

(13) To establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(14) To establish an expert review appraiser roster comprised of state-certified or licensed real estate appraisers whose purpose is to assist the director by applying their individual expertise by reviewing real estate appraisals for compliance with this chapter. Qualifications to act as an expert review appraiser shall be established by the director with the advice of the commission. An application to serve as an expert review appraiser shall be submitted to the real estate appraiser program, and the roster of accepted expert review appraisers shall be maintained by the department. An expert review appraiser may be added to or deleted from that roster by the director. The expert review appraiser shall be reimbursed for expenses in the same manner as the department reimburses the commission; and

(15) To do all other things necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and minimally meet the requirements of federal guidelines regarding state certification or licensure of appraisers and registration of state-registered appraiser trainees that the director determines are appropriate for state-certified and state-licensed appraisers and state-registered appraiser trainees in this state, except as provided for in RCW 18.140.300.

[ 2023 c 464 s 2; 2005 c 339 s 4; 2002 c 86 s 238; 2000 c 249 s 2; 1996 c 182 s 4; 1993 c 30 s 4; 1989 c 414 s 7.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2023 c 464: See note following RCW 18.140.310.

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.